voikko-fi/vvfst/poikkeavat-sukija.lexc
[Lp]taiwanin:taiwanin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]tanimbarin:tanimbarin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]tansanian:tansanian EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]tasmanian:tasmanian EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]teksasin:teksasin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]timorin:timorin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]tonavan:tonavan EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]transvaalin:transvaalin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]tyynenmeren:tyynenmeren EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]ugandan:ugandan EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]uudenenglannin:uudenenglannin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]uudenguinean:uudenguinean EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]uudenirlannin:uudenirlannin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]uudenkaledonian:uudenkaledonian EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]uudenseelannin:uudenseelannin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]walesin:walesin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]vanuatun:vanuatun EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]venezuelan:venezuelan EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]wetarin:wetarin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]virginian:virginian EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]äänisniemen:äänisniemen EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;
[Lp]öölannin:öölannin EtuliitteenJatko_ellelnelt;


LEXICON SukijaLukusananErikoisjälkiliite
[Bc][Ll][Xp]kohtauksinen[X]kohtauksi:kohtauksi LukusananJälkiliiteNainen_a ;
[Bc][Ll][Xp]käyttöinen[X]käyttöi:käyttöi       LukusananJälkiliiteNainen_ä ;
[Bc][Ll][Xp]nopeuksinen[X]nopeuksi:nopeuksi    LukusananJälkiliiteNainen_a ;
[Bc][Ll][Xp]paisuntainen[X]paisuntai:paisuntai LukusananJälkiliiteNainen_a ;
[Bc][Ll][Xp]siirtoinen[X]siirtoi:siirtoi       LukusananJälkiliiteNainen_a ;
[Bc][Ll][Xp]valintainen[X]valintai:valintai    LukusananJälkiliiteNainen_a ;
[Bc][Ll][Xp]vivahduksinen[X]vivahduksi:vivahduksi LukusananJälkiliiteNainen_a ;


LEXICON SukijaLukusana
[Lu][Xp]seitsemän[X]seitse[Sp][Ny]ntä:seitsentä   LukusanaSpNy29_ä ;
[Lu][Xp]seitsemän[X]seitse[Ses][Ny]nnä:seitsennä  LukusanaSesNy29_ä ;
[Lu][Xp]seitsemän[X]seitse[Sg][Nm]mäin:seitsemäin LukusanaSgNm29_ä ;
[Lu][Xp]seitsemän[X]seitse[Sg][Nm]nten:seitsenten LukusanaSgNm29_ä ;
[Lu][Xp]kahdeksan[X]kahdeks:kaheks	LukusanaSeitsemän_a	;
[Lu][Xp]yhdeksän[X]yhdeks:yheks	LukusanaSeitsemän_ä             ;
	

LEXICON SukijaJärjestysluku
[Lu][Xp]yhdes[X]yhde:yhe	JärjestyslukuKahdeksas_ä	;
[Lu][Xp]kahdeksas[X]kahdeksa:kaheksa	JärjestyslukuKahdeksas_a	;
[Lu][Xp]yhdeksäs[X]yhdeksä:yheksä	JärjestyslukuKahdeksas_ä	;


LEXICON SukijaPoikkeavat_ee
[Lee][Xp]Napoleon[X]napoleon:napooleon EtunimiEdam_a ;
[Lee][Xp]Platon[X]platon:platoon EtunimiKalsium_a ;
[Lee][Xp]Tšingis[X]tšingi:tschingi EtunimiVastaus_ä ;
[Lee][Xp]Tšingis[X]tšingi:tshingi EtunimiVastaus_ä ;

LEXICON SukijaPoikkeavat_em
[Lem][Xp]Sloggi[X]slogg:slogg NimiRisti_a ;
[Lem][Xp]Suomi-neiti[X]suomi-[Bm]nei[Sg][Ny]den:suomi-neiden Loppu ;


LEXICON SukijaPoikkeavat_ep
[Lep][Xp]Akhaia[X]akhai:akai PaikannimiApila_a ;
[Lep][Xp]Albania[X]albani:albaani PaikannimiApila_a ;
[Lep][Xp]Bulgaria[X]bulgari:bulgaari PaikannimiApila_a ;
[Lep][Xp]Fär=saari[X]fär[Bm]saar@P.EI_YKS.ON@:fäärsaar@P.EI_YKS.ON@ PaikannimiTuohi_a ;
[Lep][Xp]Ikonion[X]ikonion:ikoonion PaikannimiKalsium_a ;
[Lep][Xp]Isokylä[X][Sn][Ny]iso[Bm]kylä:isokylä	PaikannimiNormaaliYsJatkoOl_ä	;
[Lep][Xp]Isokylä[X][Sg][Ny]ison[Bm]kylän:isonkylän	PaikannimiYksikönGenetiivinJatko_ä	;
[Lep][Xp]Isokylä[X][Sp][Ny]isoa[Bm]kylää:isoakylää	PaikannimiLiOlV_ä	;
[Lep][Xp]Isokylä[X][Ses][Ny]isona[Bm]kylänä:isonakylänä	PaikannimiLiOlV_ä	;
[Lep][Xp]Isokylä[X][Str][Ny]isoksi[Bm]kyläksi:isoksikyläksi	PaikannimiLiOlI_ä	;
[Lep][Xp]Isokylä[X][Sine][Ny]isossa[Bm]kylässä:isossakylässä	PaikannimiLiOlV_ä	;
[Lep][Xp]Isokylä[X][Sela][Ny]isosta[Bm]kylästä:isostakylästä	PaikannimiLiOlV_ä	;
[Lep][Xp]Isokylä[X][Sill][Ny]isoon[Bm]kylää:isoonkylää	PaikannimiLiOlN_ä	;
[Lep][Xp]Isokylä[X][Sill][Ny]isoon[Bm]kylähä:isoonkylähän	PaikannimiLiOlN_ä	;
[Lep][Xp]Isokylä[X][Sade][Ny]isolla[Bm]kylällä:isollakylällä	PaikannimiLiOlV_ä	;
[Lep][Xp]Isokylä[X][Sabl][Ny]isolta[Bm]kylältä:isoltakylältä	PaikannimiLiOlV_ä	;
[Lep][Xp]Isokylä[X][Sall][Ny]isolle[Bm]kylälle:isollekylälle	PaikannimiLiOlV_ä	;
[Lep][Xp]Isokylä[X][Sab][Ny]isotta[Bm]kylättä:isottakylättä	PaikannimiLiOlV_ä	;
[Lep][Xp]Isosuo[X][Sn][Ny]iso[Bm]suo:isosuo	PaikannimiNormaaliYsJatkoOl_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isosuo[X][Sg][Ny]ison[Bm]suon:isonsuon	PaikannimiYksikönGenetiivinJatko_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isosuo[X][Sp][Ny]isoa[Bm]suota:isoasuota	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isosuo[X][Ses][Ny]isona[Bm]suona:isonasuona	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isosuo[X][Str][Ny]isoksi[Bm]suoksi:isoksisuoksi	PaikannimiLiOlI_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isosuo[X][Sine][Ny]isossa[Bm]suossa:isossasuossa	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isosuo[X][Sela][Ny]isosta[Bm]suosta:isostasuosta	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isosuo[X][Sill][Ny]isoon[Bm]suoho:isoonsuoho		PaikannimiLiOlN_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isosuo[X][Sade][Ny]isolla[Bm]suolla:isollasuolla	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isosuo[X][Sabl][Ny]isolta[Bm]suolta:isoltasuolta	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isosuo[X][Sall][Ny]isolle[Bm]suolle:isollesuolle	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isosuo[X][Sab][Ny]isotta[Bm]suotta:isottasuotta	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isosuo[X]iso[Bm]suo:isosuo	Johdin_lAinen_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isotalo[X][Sn][Ny]iso[Bm]talo:isotalo	PaikannimiNormaaliYsJatkoOl_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isotalo[X][Sg][Ny]ison[Bm]talon:isontalon	PaikannimiYksikönGenetiivinJatko_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isotalo[X][Sp][Ny]isoa[Bm]taloa:isoataloa	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isotalo[X][Ses][Ny]isona[Bm]talona:isonatalona	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isotalo[X][Str][Ny]isoksi[Bm]taloksi:isoksitaloksi	PaikannimiLiOlI_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isotalo[X][Sine][Ny]isossa[Bm]talossa:isossatalossa	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isotalo[X][Sela][Ny]isosta[Bm]talosta:isostatalosta	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isotalo[X][Sill][Ny]isoon[Bm]taloo:isoontaloo		PaikannimiLiOlN_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isotalo[X][Sade][Ny]isolla[Bm]talolla:isollatalolla	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isotalo[X][Sabl][Ny]isolta[Bm]talolta:isoltatalolta	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isotalo[X][Sall][Ny]isolle[Bm]talolle:isolletalolle	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isotalo[X][Sab][Ny]isotta[Bm]talotta:isottatalotta	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Isotalo[X]iso[Bm]talo:isotalo	Johdin_lAinen_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Italia[X]itali:itaali PaikannimiKarahka_a 
[Lep][Xp]Kaunisportti[X][Sn][Ny]kaunis[Bm]portti:kaunisportti       PaikannimiNormaaliYsJatkoOl_a ;
[Lep][Xp]Kaunisportti[X][Sg][Ny]kauniin[Bm]portti:kauniinportti     Omistusliite_a ;
[Lep][Xp]Kaunisportti[X][Sg][Ny]kauniin[Bm]portin:kauniinportin     PaikannimiYksikönGenetiivinJatko_a ;
[Lep][Xp]Kaunisportti[X][Sp][Ny]kaunista[Bm]porttia:kaunistaporttia       PaikannimiLiOlV_a ;
[Lep][Xp]Kaunisportti[X][Ses][Ny]kauniina[Bm]porttina:kauniinaporttina    PaikannimiLiOlV_a ;
[Lep][Xp]Kaunisportti[X][Str][Ny]kauniiksi[Bm]portiksi:kauniiksiportiksi  PaikannimiLiOlI_a ;
[Lep][Xp]Kaunisportti[X][Sine][Ny]kauniissa[Bm]portissa:kauniissaportissa PaikannimiLiOlV_a ;
[Lep][Xp]Kaunisportti[X][Sela][Ny]kauniista[Bm]portista:kauniistaportista PaikannimiLiOlV_a ;
[Lep][Xp]Kaunisportti[X][Sill][Ny]kauniiseen[Bm]porttii:kauniiseenporttii PaikannimiLiOlN_a ;
[Lep][Xp]Kaunisportti[X][Sade][Ny]kauniilla[Bm]portilla:kauniillaportilla PaikannimiLiOlV_a ;
[Lep][Xp]Kaunisportti[X][Sabl][Ny]kauniilta[Bm]portilta:kauniiltaportilta PaikannimiLiOlV_a ;
[Lep][Xp]Kaunisportti[X][Sall][Ny]kauniille[Bm]portille:kauniilleportille PaikannimiLiOlV_a ;
[Lep][Xp]Kaunisportti[X][Sab][Ny]kauniitta[Bm]portitta:kauniittaportitta  PaikannimiLiOlV_a ;
[Lep][Xp]Vanhakirkko[X][Sn][Ny]vanha[Bm]kirkko:vanhakirkko	PaikannimiNormaaliYsJatkoOl_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Vanhakirkko[X][Sg][Ny]vanhan[Bm]kirkko:vanhankirkko	Omistusliite_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Vanhakirkko[X][Sg][Ny]vanhan[Bm]kirkon:vanhankirkon	PaikannimiYksikönGenetiivinJatko_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Vanhakirkko[X][Sp][Ny]vanhaa[Bm]kirkkoa:vanhaakirkkoa  	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Vanhakirkko[X][Ses][Ny]vanhana[Bm]kirkkona:vanhanakirkkona	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Vanhakirkko[X][Str][Ny]vanhaksi[Bm]kirkoksi:vanhaksikirkoksi	PaikannimiLiOlI_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Vanhakirkko[X][Sine][Ny]vanhassa[Bm]kirkossa:vanhassakirkossa	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Vanhakirkko[X][Sela][Ny]vanhasta[Bm]kirkosta:vanhastakirkosta	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Vanhakirkko[X][Sill][Ny]vanhaan[Bm]kirkkoo:vanhaankirkkoo	PaikannimiLiOlN_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Vanhakirkko[X][Sade][Ny]vanhalla[Bm]kirkolla:vanhallakirkolla	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Vanhakirkko[X][Sabl][Ny]vanhalta[Bm]kirkolta:vanhaltakirkolta	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Vanhakirkko[X][Sall][Ny]vanhalle[Bm]kirkolle:vanhallekirkolle	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Vanhakirkko[X][Sab][Ny]vanhatta[Bm]kirkotta:vanhattakirkotta	PaikannimiLiOlV_a	;
[Lep][Xp]Vanhakirkko[X]vanha[Bm]kirkko:vanhakirkko Johdin_lAinen_a ;
